zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 野营与远足 > 帐篷配件: 防风绳与绳索; 帐篷内帐; 防水布与防雨罩; 帐篷地锚与安装五金件; 帐篷遮阳篷与附属帐篷; 帐篷地布; 帐篷置物网与收纳袋; 帐篷垫与地毯; 帐篷杆零件和配件; 帐篷杆维修套件; 帐篷固定支架桩/地钉; 帐篷维修与保养用品; 帐篷前庭
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Къмпинг и туризъм > Аксесоари за палатки: Обтегачи и въжета; Вътрешни палатки; Брезенти и покривала за дъжд; Анкери за палатки и монтаж елементи; Тенти и пристройки за палатки; Подложки за палатка; Органайзери и шкафове за предверия на палатки; Постелки и килими за палатки; Части и аксесоари за рейки за палатки; Комплекти за ремонт на рейки за палатки; Рейки и колчета за палатки; Консумативи за ремонт и поддръжка на палатки; Предверия за палатки
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Kamperen en wandelen > Tentaccessoires: Scheerlijnen en touwen; Binnententen; Tarps en regendaken; Tentankers en bevestigingsmateriaal; Tentluifels en -aanbouwen; Tentgrondzeilen; Tent-organizers en -bagagenetten; Tenttapijten en -matten; Onderdelen en accessoires voor tentstokken; Reparatiekits voor tentstokken; Tentstokken en haringen; Reparatie- en onderhoudsartikelen voor tenten; Voortenten
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Кемпинги и походы > Аксессуары для палаток: Оттяжки и веревки для палаток; Внутренние палатки; Тенты и накидки от дождя; Колышки и крепеж для палаток; Тамбуры и навесы для палаток; Футпринты для палаток; Полочки и органайзеры для палаток; Коврики и подстилки для палаток; Детали и аксессуары для дуг палаток; Ремкомплекты для дуг палаток; Колышки и стойки для палаток; Средства для ремонта и ухода за палатками; Тамбуры для палаток
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Kempovanie a turistika > Príslušenstvo pre stany: Napínacie šnúry a laná; Vnútorné stany; Plachty proti dažďu; Kotvy a montážny materiál na stany; Markízy a prístavby k stanom; Plachty pod stan; Prenosné regály a organizéry do stanu; Rohože a koberce do stanu; Súčiastky a príslušenstvo pre stanové tyče; Súpravy na opravu tyčí stanov; Stanové tyče a kolíky; Potreby na opravu a údržbu stanov; Stanové predsiene
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kampçılık ve Doğa Yürüyüşü > Çadır Aksesuarları: Gergi ipleri ve halatlar; İç Çadırlar; Brandalar ve çadır yağmurlukları; Çadır sabitleyicileri ve montaj donanımları; Çadır tenteleri ve ek odaları; Çadır Tabanları; Çadır eşya askıları ve düzenleyicileri; Çadır matları ve halıları; Çadır direği parçaları ve aksesuarları; Çadır direği tamir kitleri; Çadır Direk ve Kazıkları; Çadır tamir ve bakım malzemeleri; Çadır Girişleri
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Camping et randonnée > Accessoires de tente: Haubans et cordages; Toiles intérieures; Bâches et doubles-toits; Ancrages et matériel de montage pour tente; Auvents et annexes de tente; Tapis de sol pour tente; Filets de rangement et organisateurs pour tente; Tapis et moquettes de tente; Pièces et accessoires d'arceaux de tentes; Kits de réparation d'arceaux de tentes; Mâts et piquets de tente; Fournitures de réparation et d’entretien pour tente; Espaces de rangement pour tente
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Camping & Hiking > Tent Accessories: Guy Lines & Ropes; Inner Tents; Tarps & Rain Flies; Tent Anchors & Mounting Hardware; Tent Awnings & Annexes; Tent Footprints; Tent Gear Lofts & Organizers; Tent Mats & Carpets; Tent Pole Parts & Accessories; Tent Pole Repair Kits; Tent Poles & Stakes; Tent Repair & Maintenance Supplies; Tent Vestibules
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Kampiranje i planinarenje > Dodaci za šatore: Konopi i užad za zatezanje za šator; Unutarnji šatori; Cerade i zaštitne mreže za kišu; Sidra i montažna oprema za šatore; Tende i dodaci za šatore; Prostirka za šatore; Potkrovlja i organizatori za opremu za šatore; Prostirke i tepisi za šatore; Dijelovi i dodaci za stupove za šator; Kompleti za popravak stupova za šator; Stupovi i kolci za šatore; Pribor za popravak i održavanje šatora; Predsoblje šatora
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kemping és túrázás > Sátorkiegészítők: Feszítőkötelek és sátorkötelek; Belső sátrak; Ponyvák és esővédő tetők; Sátorrögzítők és -szerelvények; Sátorellenzők és előtetők; Sátorlábnyomok; Sátorbeli tárolóhálók és -rendszerezők; Sátorszőnyegek és -alátétek; Sátorrúd-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Sátorrúdjavító-készletek; Sátorrudak és -karók; Sátorjavító és -karbantartó felszerelések; Sátor-előszobák
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Campeggio e trekking > Accessori per tende: Tiranti e corde; Tende interne; Teli impermeabili e copritenda; Ancoraggi e componenti di montaggio per tenda; Verande e annessi per tenda; Protezioni a terra per tende; Rete portaoggetti e organizer per tenda; Tappetini e tappeti per tenda; Componenti e accessori per pali da tenda; Kit di riparazione per pali da tenda; Pali e paletti per tende; Articoli per la riparazione e la manutenzione della tenda; Vestiboli per tende
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κατασκήνωση & πεζοπορία > Αξεσουάρ σκηνών: Εντατήρες και σχοινιά; Εσωτερικές σκηνές; Μουσαμάδες και εξωτερικά καλύμματα σκηνών; Πασαλάκια και εξαρτήματα στερέωσης σκηνών; Τέντες και προσθήκες σκηνών; Υποστρώματα σκηνής; Δίχτυα οροφής και θήκες οργάνωσης σκηνής; Πατάκια και χαλιά σκηνών; Εξαρτήματα & αξεσουάρ για μπανέλες σκηνής; Κιτ επισκευής για μπανέλες σκηνής; Πάσσαλοι και κοντάρια σκηνής; Υλικά επισκευής και συντήρησης σκηνών; Προθάλαμοι σκηνής
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 캠핑/하이킹 > 텐트 부대용품: 가이라인 및 로프; 이너 텐트; 타프 및 레인플라이; 텐트 앵커 및 마운팅 하드웨어; 텐트 어닝 및 어넥스; 텐트 바닥; 텐트 기어 로프트 및 오거나이저; 텐트 매트 및 카펫; 텐트 폴대 부품 및 액세서리; 텐트 폴대 수리 키트; 텐트 기둥/말뚝; 텐트 수리 및 유지보수 용품; 텐트 베스티블
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 露營和健行 > 帳篷配件: 營繩; 帳篷內帳; 天幕與防雨外帳; 帳篷固定器與安裝硬體; 帳篷天幕與延伸帳; 帳篷地布; 帳篷置物網與收納袋; 帳篷地墊與地毯; 帳篷營柱零件與配件; 帳篷營柱修補工具包; 帳篷營柱和帳篷樁; 帳篷修補與保養用品; 帳篷前庭
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Camping și drumeții > Accesorii pentru corturi: Sfori și frânghii de ancorare; Corturi interioare; Prelate și folii de ploaie; Ancore și accesorii de fixare pentru cort; Copertine și anexe pentru corturi; Prelate de protecție pentru cort; Hamace interioare și organizatoare pentru corturi; Covoare și preșuri pentru cort; Piese și accesorii pentru bețe de cort; Truse de reparații pentru bețe de cort; Stâlpi și țăruși pentru corturi; Consumabile de reparație și întreținere a cortului; Zone de intrare pentru cort
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kampiranje in pohodništvo > Dodatki za šotore: Napenjalne vrvi; Notranji šotori; Cerade in dežne prevleke za šotore; Sidra in pritrdilni montažni elementi za šotore; Tende in predprostori za šotore; Šotorske podloge; Mrežaste police in organizatorji za šotore; Podloge in preproge za šotore; Deli in dodatki za palice za šotore; Kompleti za popravilo palic za šotor; Palice in klini za šotore; Pripomočki za popravilo in vzdrževanje šotorov; Šotorski predprostori
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Campismo e caminhada > Acessórios para tenda: Espias e cordas; Tendas interiores; Oleados e sobretetos; Âncoras e ferragens de montagem para tendas; Toldos e anexos para tendas; Tela de chão para tenda; Redes de arrumação e organizadores para tendas; Tapetes e carpetes para tendas; Peças e acessórios para varetas de tenda; Kits de reparação para varetas de tenda; Estacas e postes para tenda; Materiais de reparação e manutenção de tendas; Vestíbulos para tenda
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > キャンプ ・ハイキング > テント関連用品: ガイライン・ロープ; インナーテント; タープ・レインフライ; テント用アンカー・マウント金具; テントオーニング・アネックス; テント用グランドシート; テント用ギアルーフ・オーガナイザー; テント用マット・カーペット; テントポールパーツ＆アクセサリー; テントポール修理キット; テント用ポール・杭; テント修理・メンテナンス用品; テント用前室
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Retkeily ja vaellus > Telttatarvikkeet: Telttanarut ja köydet; Sisäteltat; Tarpit ja sadesuojat; Teltan ankkurit ja kiinnitystarvikkeet; Teltan katokset ja lisäosat; Teltta-alustat; Teltan varusteverkot ja lokerikot; Telttamatot ja -alustat; Teltan kaarien osat ja lisävarusteet; Teltan kaarien korjaussarjat; Telttakepit ja kiilat; Teltan korjaus- ja huoltotarvikkeet; Teltan eteistilat
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Camping, vandring och backpacking > Tälttillbehör: Tältlinor och rep; Innertält; Presenningar och regnskydd; Tältförankring och monteringsutrustning; Tältmarkiser och annex; Tältunderlag; Utrustningshyllor och förvaring för tält; Tältmattor; Delar och tillbehör för tältstänger; Reparationskit för tältstänger; Tältstänger och tältpinnar; Tillbehör för tältreparation och underhåll; Förtält
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Camping og fjellvandring > Telttilbehør: Barduner og tau; Innertelt; Presenninger og regntrekk; Teltankere og monteringsutstyr; Teltmarkiser og fortelt; Teltunderlag; Oppbevaringsnett og organisatorer til telt; Teltmatter og tepper; Deler og tilbehør til teltstenger; Reparasjonssett for teltstenger; Teltstenger og plugger; Utstyr til reparasjon og vedlikehold av telt; Teltvestibyler
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Stovyklavimas ir žygiai > Palapinių priedai: Palapinių įtempimo virvės ir lynai; Vidinės palapinės; Brezentai ir apsauginiai lietaus uždangalai; Palapinių inkarai ir tvirtinimo detalės; Palapinių stogeliai ir priestatai; Palapinių pagrindai pėdsakai; Palapinių pakabinamos lentynos ir organizatoriai; Palapinių kilimėliai ir kilimai; Palapinių strypų dalys ir priedai; Palapinių strypų remonto rinkiniai; Palapinių vamzdeliai ir kuoliukai; Palapinių remonto ir priežiūros reikmenys; Palapinių prieangiai
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cắm trại & Đi bộ đường dài > Phụ kiện lều trại: Dây dù căng lều; Lều bên trong; Tấm bạt và tấm phủ chống mưa lều; Cọc neo và phụ kiện lắp lều; Mái che và lều phụ; Tấm/thảm lót lều trại; Túi lưới treo đồ và khay xếp đồ lều; Thảm và đệm trải lều; Phụ kiện và bộ phận cọc lều; Bộ sửa chữa cọc lều; Cọc và khung lều trại; Vật dụng sửa chữa và bảo dưỡng lều; Mái hiên lều trại
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Camping y senderismo > Accesorios para tiendas de campaña: Vientos y cuerdas; Tiendas interiores; Lonas y cubretechos impermeables; Anclajes y herrajes de montaje para tiendas de campaña; Toldos y anexos para tiendas de campaña; Protectores de suelo para tiendas de campaña; Organizadores y altillos para tiendas de campaña; Esterillas y alfombras para tiendas de campaña; Piezas y accesorios para varillas de tiendas de campaña; Kits de reparación para varillas de tiendas de campaña; Mástiles y estacas para tiendas de campaña; Suministros de reparación y mantenimiento para tiendas de campaña; Carpas para tiendas de campaña
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Acampamento e caminhada > Acessórios para barracas: Cordas e tensores de barraca; Parte interna da barraca; Lonas e sobretetos; Âncoras e equipamentos de montagem para barracas; Toldos e anexos para barracas; Bases de barracas; Organizadores e prateleiras suspensas para barracas; Tapetes e esteiras para barracas; Peças e acessórios para varetas de barraca; Kits de reparo para varetas de barraca; Estacas e varetas de barracas; Suprimentos de manutenção e reparo de barracas; Vestíbulos de barraca
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Camping og vandreture > Telttilbehør: Barduner og reb; Indertelte; Presenninger og oversejl; Teltankre og monteringshardware; Fortelte og annekser; Teltunderlag; Opbevaringsnet og -lommer til telte; Teltmåtter og gulvtæpper; Dele og tilbehør til teltstænger; Reparationssæt til teltstænger; Teltpæle og pløkke; Udstyr til reparation og vedligeholdelse af telte; Teltsejl
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Camping & Wandern > Zeltzubehör: Abspannleinen & Seile; Innenzelte; Tarps & Überzelte; Zeltanker & Montagematerial; Zeltmarkisen & -anbauten; Zeltunterlagen; Zelt-Ablagenetze & -Organizer; Zeltunterlagen & -teppiche; Ersatzteile & Zubehör für Zeltstangen; Reparatur-Sets für Zeltstangen; Zeltstangen & -Heringe; Zelt-Reparatur- & -Pflegebedarf; Vorzelte
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Kempování a turistika > Stany – příslušenství: Kotevní šňůry a lana; Vnitřní části stanů; Celty a tropika; Kotvy a montážní hardware pro stany; Stanové markýzy a přístřešky; Stanové podlážky; Závěsné sítě a organizéry do stanu; Podložky a koberce do stanu; Díly a příslušenství ke stanovým prutům; Sady na opravu stanových prutů; Stanové tyčky a kolíky; Potřeby pro opravu a údržbu stanů; Stanové předsíňky
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การตั้งแคมป์และเดินเขา > อุปกรณ์เต็นท์: เชือกขึงเต็นท์; ชั้นในของเตนท์; ฟลายชีทและผ้าใบกันฝน; สมอบกและฮาร์ดแวร์ยึดเต็นท์; กันสาดและส่วนต่อขยายเต็นท์; ที่รองเต็นท์; ตาข่ายแขวนของและที่จัดระเบียบในเต็นท์; เสื่อและพรมปูเต็นท์; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเสาเต็นท์; ชุดเครื่องมือซ่อมแซมเสาเต็นท์; หมุดและเสาของเต็นท์; อุปกรณ์ซ่อมและบำรุงรักษาเต็นท์; ส่วนต่อเติมด้านหน้าเต็นท์
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Camping i chodzenie po górach > Akcesoria do namiotów: Odciągi i linki; Sypialnie do namiotów; Tarpy i tropiki; Kotwy i osprzęt montażowy do namiotów; Przedsionki i zadaszenia do namiotów; Podłogi do namiotów; Półki siatkowe i organizery do namiotów; Maty i dywany namiotowe; Części i akcesoria do stelaży namiotowych; Zestawy naprawcze do stelaży namiotowych; Maszty i śledzie; Materiały do naprawy i konserwacji namiotów; Podłogi absydy